test/src/morphology/adj-ak_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

# Adjectives that end on -k. From lexicon BASSTEL,RITSOK, NAMÁK ,MUTTÁK, GÅBDDÅK, ALLAK, AGAdj, BASSTEL, STUORAK and SJÆVNNJAT

Tests:

  Adjective - tjårvak: # AGAdj
    tjårvak+A+Attr: tjårvak
    tjårvak+A+Sg+Nom: tjårvak
    tjårvak+A+Sg+Ine: tjårvagin
    tjårvak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    tjårvak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []
    tjårvak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: []
    tjårvak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Der/at+Adv: []
    tjårvak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gielak: # AGAdj
    gielak+A+Attr: gielak 
    gielak+A+Sg+Nom: gielak 
    gielak+A+Sg+Acc: gielagav 
    gielak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    gielak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - gilduk: # AGAdj
    gilduk+A+Attr: gilduk 
    gilduk+A+Sg+Nom: gilduk 
    gilduk+A+Sg+Com: gildugijn 
    gilduk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    gilduk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - vuonnak: # AGAdj and BASSTEL
    vuonnak+A+Attr: [vuonnak, vuonnagis]
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Nom: vuonnak
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Gen: vuonnaga
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Acc: vuonnagav
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ill: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ine: vuonnagin
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Ela: vuonnagis
    vuonnak+A+Sg+Com: vuonnagijn
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Nom: vuonnaga
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Gen: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Acc: vuonnagijt
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ill: vuonnagijda
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ine: vuonnagijn
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Ela: vuonnagijs
    vuonnak+A+Pl+Com: vuonnagij
    vuonnak+A+Ess: vuonnagin
    vuonnak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: vuonnagabbo
    vuonnak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: vuonnagamos

  Adjective - gassak: # ALLAK  galggá så -appot?
    gassak+A+Attr: gassa 
    gassak+A+Sg+Nom: gassak 
    gassak+A+Sg+Gen: gassaga 
    gassak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gasep
    gassak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gasemus
    gassak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [gasebut, gassagappot]
    gassak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [gasemusát, gassagabmusit]
    gassak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gasebusj
    gassak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gasebuttjat
    gassak+A+Der/at+Adv: gassagit
    gassak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gassavuohta

  Adjective - allak: # ALLAK galggá så -appot?
    allak+A+Attr: alla 
    allak+A+Sg+Nom: allak 
    allak+A+Sg+Acc: allagav 
    allak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: alep
    allak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: alemus
    allak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [alebut, allagappot]
    allak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [alemusát, allagabmusit]
    allak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: alebusj
    allak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: alebuttjat
    allak+A+Der/at+Adv: allagit
    allak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: allavuohta

  Adjective - gåbddåk: # GÅBDDÅK  galggá så -appot?
    gåbddåk+A+Attr: gåbddå 
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Nom: gåbddåk 
    gåbddåk+A+Sg+Acc: gåbddågav 
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gåbdep
    gåbddåk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gåbdemus
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: [gåbdebut, gåbddågappot]
    gåbddåk+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: [gåbdemusát, gåbddågabmusit]
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gåbdebusj
    gåbddåk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gåbdebuttjat
    gåbddåk+A+Der/at+Adv: gåbddågit
    gåbddåk+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gåbddåvuohta

  Adjective - girjak: # MUTTÁK give both -k and -gis attr
    girjak+A+Attr: [girjak, girjagis]
    girjak+A+Sg+Nom: girjak 
    girjak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: girjagabbo
    girjak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: girjagamos
    girjak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: girjagappot
    girjak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: girjagabmusit
    girjak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: girjagappusj
    girjak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: girjagapputjit
    girjak+A+Der/at+Adv: girjagit
    girjak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: girjakvuohta

  Adjective - jagák: # AGAdj
    jagák+A+Attr: jagák 
    jagák+A+Sg+Nom: jagák
    jagák+A+Sg+Acc: jagágav
    jagák+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: []
    jagák+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: []

  Adjective - rihtsok: # RIHTSOK
    rihtsok+A+Attr: rihtso 
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Nom: rihtsok 
    rihtsok+A+Sg+Com: rihtsogijn 
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: rihtsogabbo
    rihtsok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: rihtsogamos
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogappot
    rihtsok+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogabmusit
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: rihtsogappusj
    rihtsok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogapputjit
    rihtsok+A+Der/at+Adv: rihtsogit
    rihtsok+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: rihtsovuohta

  Adjective - roahkok: # BASSTEL
    roahkok+A+Attr: roahkogis 
    roahkok+A+Sg+Nom: roahkok 
    roahkok+A+Sg+Ine: roahkogin 
    roahkok+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: roahkogabbo
    roahkok+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: roahkogamos
    roahkok+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: roahkogappot
    roahkok+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: roahkogabmusit
    roahkok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: roahkogappusj
    roahkok+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: roahkogapputjit
    roahkok+A+Der/at+Adv: roahkogit
    roahkok+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: roahkogisvuohta

  Adjective - skárbak: # SKÁRBAK
    skárbak+A+Attr: skárbbis
    skárbak+A+Sg+Nom: skárbak
    skárbak+A+Sg+Acc: skárbagav
    skárbak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: skárbagabbo
    skárbak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: skárbagamos
    skárbak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: skárbagappot
    skárbak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: skárbagabmusit
    skárbak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: skárbagappusj
    skárbak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: skárbagapputjit
    skárbak+A+Der/at+Adv: skárbagit
    skárbak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: skárbbisvuohta

  Adjective - gasuk: # SJÆVNNJAT
    gasuk+A+Attr: gassa
    gasuk+A+Sg+Nom: gasuk 
    gasuk+A+Sg+Gen: gasuga 
    gasuk+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: gasugabbo
    gasuk+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: gasugamos
    gasuk+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: gasugappot
    gasuk+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: gasugabmusit
    gasuk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: gasugappusj
    gasuk+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: gasugapputjit
    gasuk+A+Der/at+Adv: gasugit
    gasuk+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: gassavuohta

  Adjective - stuorak: # STUORAK
    stuorak+A+Attr: [stuor, stuorra] 
    stuorak+A+Sg+Nom: stuorak 
    stuorak+A+Sg+Acc: stuoragav 
    stuorak+A+Comp+Sg+Nom: stuoráp
    stuorak+A+Superl+Sg+Nom: stuorámus
    stuorak+A+Comp+Der/at+Adv: stuorábut
    stuorak+A+Superl+Der/at+Adv: stuorámusát
    stuorak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Sg+Nom: stuorábusj
    stuorak+A+Comp+Der/Dimin+Der/at+Adv: stuorábuttjat
    stuorak+A+Der/at+Adv: stuoragit
    stuorak+A+Attr+Der/vuohta+N+Sg+Nom: stuorravuohta
